Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3133
Administrator of Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact; duties.

The chairperson of the board or his or her designee shall serve as the administrator of the Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact for the State of Nebraska. The administrator shall give notice of withdrawal to the executive heads of all other party states within thirty days after the effective date of any statute repealing the compact enacted by the Legislature pursuant to Article XIII of the compact.

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 46.

Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact, see section 38-3901.